North Dakota statutes. TITLE 24 Highways, Bridges, And Ferries
CHAPTER 24-18 Limited Transportation Network

24-18-01.
Primary network.

The department of transportation shall establish a limited transportation network within this state. The initial network consists of selected highways and the interstate system to serve as the foundation for this system. The department may modify the foundation through a public involvement process established by the department. The foundation for the system consists of:

United States highway 83 from the South Dakota border to Minot;

United States highway 85 from the South Dakota border to Williston;

United States highway 52 from Minot to the Canadian border;

United States highway 2 from the Montana border to the Minnesota border;

Interstate highway 94 from the Montana border to the Minnesota border, subject to federal approval; and

Interstate highway 29 from the South Dakota border to the Canadian border, subject to federal approval.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

24-18-02.
Process for modification.

The department of transportation shall establish a process to adjust the network by adding specific segments of the United States or state highway system. The process must include an advisory committee to provide input to the department in actions taken to adjust the system, taking into consideration the economic needs and benefits, investment and maintenance requirements, and safety.

The department shall establish a request mechanism for commercial entities and for individuals who reside in the state to request specific augmentations of the system based on economic need and outcomes.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

24-18-03.
Advisory committee.

The advisory committee must be chaired by the director of the department of transportation or a designee of the director and must consist of a representative appointed by:

The greater North Dakota chamber;

The North Dakota association of counties;

The agriculture commissioner;

The commerce commissioner;

The superintendent of the highway patrol;

The North Dakota motor carriers association;

The North Dakota league of cities; and

Representatives of short line railroads operating in this state.

The committee may be augmented by the department as deemed necessary in consultation with the advisory committee.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

24-18-04.
Conditional approval for interstate highway system within North Dakota.

The department may include the interstate highway system within the state as part of the primary foundation network if approved through passage of legislation by the Congress of the United States.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

24-18-05.
Authority to establish truck axle configuration and weight limits associated with the one hundred twenty-nine thousand pound network.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department of transportation, in consultation with the advisory committee, may adopt rules to establish the required axle configurations and weight limit requirements for trucks weighing more than one hundred five thousand five hundred pounds [47854 kilograms] utilizing the network established by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

24-18-06.
Preservation of existing truck weight provisions.

This chapter does not modify or authorize any change to the existing weight limitations for trucks with gross vehicle weight up to one hundred five thousand five hundred pounds [47854 kilograms].

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.